Hawaii statutes.
[§383-7.5] Part-time work; benefits
available. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary under this chapter, an
individual shall not be denied regular unemployment benefits relating to
availability for work, active search for work, or refusal to accept work,
solely because the individual is seeking only part-time work; provided that
this section shall not apply if a majority of the weeks of work in the
individual's base period does not include part-time work. [L 2009, c 171, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next